apertium-nob.nob.dix
<!-- sme-nob agreement-MWE nouns. TODO: use lt-mwpp for these. -->
<pardef n="bærbar/_datamaskin__n" c="lt-mwpp mwe todo. Also todo: this has an adj already, so should have special transfer rules to insert determiner...
                                     Definite form has indef noun; better to have no double defnes in ’den bærbare datamaskin’ than overdo it in
                                     ’din bærbare datamaskinen'">
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>datamaskinene</l>      <r><b/>datamaskin<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>datamaskiner</l>       <r><b/>datamaskin<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>datamaskin</l>        <r><b/>datamaskin<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>datamaskin</l>          <r><b/>datamaskin<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>datamaskinene</l>      <r><b/>datamaskin<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>datamaskiner</l>       <r><b/>datamaskin<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>datamaskin</l>       <r><b/>datamaskin<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>datamaskin</l>          <r><b/>datamaskin<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="grov/_uaktsomhet__n" c="lt-mwpp mwe todo, see bærbar/_datamaskin__n">
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>uaktsomhetene</l>      <r><b/>uaktsomhet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>uaktsomheter</l>       <r><b/>uaktsomhet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>uaktsomhet</l>        <r><b/>uaktsomhet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>uaktsomhet</l>          <r><b/>uaktsomhet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>uaktsomhetene</l>      <r><b/>uaktsomhet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>uaktsomheter</l>       <r><b/>uaktsomhet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>uaktsomhet</l>       <r><b/>uaktsomhet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>uaktsomhet</l>          <r><b/>uaktsomhet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dødelig/_sykdom__n" c="lt-mwpp mwe todo, see bærbar/_datamaskin__n">
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>sykdommene</l>      <r><b/>sykdom<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>sykdommer</l>       <r><b/>sykdom<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>sykdom</l>       <r><b/>sykdom<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>sykdom</l>          <r><b/>sykdom<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/liten_reinflokk__n" c="lt-mwpp mwe todo, see bærbar/_datamaskin__n">
  <e>       <p><l>små<b/>reinflokkene</l>      <r>liten<b/>reinflokk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>små<b/>reinflokker</l>       <r>liten<b/>reinflokk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lille<b/>reinflokken</l>       <r>liten<b/>reinflokk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>liten<b/>reinflokk</l>       <r>liten<b/>reinflokk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="snøfri/_is__n" c="lt-mwpp mwe todo, see bærbar/_datamaskin__n">
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>isene</l>      <r><b/>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>iser</l>       <r><b/>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>isen</l>       <r><b/>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>is</l>       <r><b/>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fri/_bevegelighet__n" c="lt-mwpp mwe todo, see bærbar/_datamaskin__n">
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>bevegelighetene</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>bevegeligheter</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>bevegelighetene</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>bevegelighet</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>bevegeligheta</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>bevegeligheter</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>bevegelighetene</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>bevegelighet</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>bevegeligheten</l>  <r><b/>bevegelighet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="ukokt/_kaffe__n" c="lt-mwpp mwe todo, see bærbar/_datamaskin__n">
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>kaffene</l>      <r><b/>kaffe<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>kaffer</l>       <r><b/>kaffe<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>kaffen</l>       <r><b/>kaffe<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>kaffe</l>       <r><b/>kaffe<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ukokt/_te__n" c="lt-mwpp mwe todo, see bærbar/_datamaskin__n">
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>teene</l>      <r><b/>te<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>teer</l>       <r><b/>te<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>teen</l>       <r><b/>te<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>te</l>       <r><b/>te<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ukokt kaffe">                <i>ukokt</i>           <par n="ukokt/_kaffe__n"/></e>
<e lm="fri bevegelighet">           <i>fri</i>             <par n="fri/_bevegelighet__n"/></e>
<e lm="ukokt te">                   <i>ukokt</i>           <par n="ukokt/_te__n"/></e>
<e lm="liten reinflokk">                            <par n="/liten_reinflokk__n"/></e>
<e lm="dødelig sykdom">             <i>dødelig</i>         <par n="dødelig/_sykdom__n"/></e>
<e lm="bærbar datamaskin">          <i>bærbar</i>          <par n="bærbar/_datamaskin__n"/></e>
<e lm="snøfri is">                  <i>snøfri</i>          <par n="snøfri/_is__n"/></e>
<e lm="grov uaktsomhet">            <i>grov</i>            <par n="grov/_uaktsomhet__n"/></e>
